Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-226
Election duties; who may perform.

At the discretion of the precinct or district inspector, any clerk of election may perform the duties of a judge of election and any judge of election may perform the duties of a clerk of election. The election commissioner may excuse the two clerks of election from serving at any election, and the judges of election shall perform such duties without additional compensation. The precinct inspector may perform the duties of a judge or clerk of election when authorized by the election commissioner.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 46;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 1.